Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-257
Vagrancy; offenses against public morals; punishment.

A city of the primary class may provide for the punishment of vagrants, tramps, or street beggars, prostitutes, disturbers of the peace, pickpockets, gamblers, burglars, thieves, or persons who practice any game, trick, or device with intent to swindle.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 129, LVII, p. 141;

R.S.1913, § 4467;

C.S.1922, § 3852;

C.S.1929, § 15-255;

R.S.1943, § 15-257;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 68.